Hawaii statutes.
§206E-113 Reserved housing loan programs;
fees. The authority may establish, revise, charge, and collect fees,
premiums, and charges as necessary, reasonable, or convenient, for its reserved
housing loan programs.

The fees, premiums, and charges shall be
deposited into the reserved housing loan program revenue bond special fund
established for the particular reserved housing loan program or part thereof
from which the fees, premiums and charges are derived as determined by the
authority. [L 1982, c 228, pt of §8]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next